Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-143
Sections, how construed.

Sections 10-134 to 10-142 shall be deemed to provide an additional alternative and complete method for doing of the things authorized in such sections and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by any other laws or home rule charters and shall not be regarded to be in degradation of any powers existing on March 10, 1983, except that insofar as provisions of sections 10-134 to 10-142 are inconsistent with any other law or home rule charter, the provisions of sections 10-134 to 10-142 shall be controlling.

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 16.